Missouri, session 2026, SB1344.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 72.401 and 72.420, RSMo, are repealed
and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 72.401 and 72.420, to read as follows:
72.401. 1. If a commission has been established under
sections 72.400 to 72.423 in any county with a charter form
of government where fifty or more cities, towns and villages
have been established or any county with a charter form of
government and with more than two hundred thousand but fewer
than three hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, any boundary
change within the county shall proceed solely and
exclusively in the manner provided for by sections 72.400 to
72.423, notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the
contrary concerning such boundary changes.
2. In any county with a charter form of government
where fifty or more cities, towns and villages have been
established or any county with a charter form of government
and with more than two hundred thousand but fewer than three
hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, if the governing body of
such county has by ordinance established a boundary
commission, as provided in sections 72.400 to 72.423, then

SB 1344 2
boundary changes in such county shall proceed only as
provided in sections 72.400 to 72.423.
3. The commission shall be composed of eleven members
as provided in this subsection. No member, employee or
contractor of the commission shall be an elective official,
employee or contractor of the county or of any political
subdivision within the county or of any organization
representing political subdivisions or officers or employees
of political subdivisions. Each of the appointing
authorities described in subdivisions (1) to (3) of this
subsection shall appoint persons who shall be residents of
their respective locality so described. The appointing
authority making the appointments shall be:
(1) The chief elected officials of all municipalities
wholly within the county which have a population of more
than twenty thousand persons, who shall name two members to
the commission as prescribed in this subsection each of whom
is a resident of a municipality within the county of more
than twenty thousand persons;
(2) The chief elected officials of all municipalities
wholly within the county which have a population of twenty
thousand or less but more than ten thousand persons, who
shall name one member to the commission as prescribed in
this subsection who is a resident of a municipality within
the county with a population of twenty thousand or less but
more than ten thousand persons;
(3) The chief elected officials of all municipalities
wholly within the county which have a population of ten
thousand persons or less, who shall name one member to the
commission as prescribed in this subsection who is a
resident of a municipality within the county with a
population of ten thousand persons or less;

SB 1344 3
(4) An appointive body consisting of the director of
the county department of planning, the president of the
municipal league of the county, one additional person
designated by the county executive, and one additional
person named by the board of the municipal league of the
county, which appointive body, acting by a majority of all
of its members, shall name three members of the commission
who are residents of the county; and
(5) The county executive of the county, who shall name
four members of the commission, three of whom shall be from
the unincorporated area of the county and one of whom shall
be from the incorporated area of the county.
The seat of a commissioner shall be automatically vacated
when the commissioner changes his or her residence so as to
no longer conform to the terms of the requirements of the
commissioner's appointment. The commission shall promptly
notify the appointing authority of such change of residence.
4. Upon the passage of an ordinance by the governing
body of the county establishing a boundary commission, the
governing body of the county shall, within ten days, send by
United States mail written notice of the passage of the
ordinance to the chief elected official of each municipality
wholly or partly in the county.
5. Each of the appointing authorities described in
subdivisions (1) to (4) of subsection 3 of this section
shall meet within thirty days of the passage of the
ordinance establishing the commission to compile its list of
appointees. Each list shall be delivered to the county
executive within forty-one days of the passage of such
ordinance. The county executive shall appoint members
within forty-five days of the passage of the ordinance. If

SB 1344 4
a list is not submitted by the time specified, the county
executive shall appoint the members using the criteria of
subsection 3 of this section before the sixtieth day from
the passage of the ordinance. At the first meeting of the
commission appointed after the effective date of the
ordinance, the commissioners shall choose by lot the length
of their terms. Three shall serve for one year, two for two
years, two for three years, two for four years, and two for
five years. All succeeding commissioners shall serve for
five years. Terms shall end on December thirty-first of the
respective year. No commissioner shall serve more than two
consecutive full terms. Full terms shall include any term
longer than two years.
6. When a member's term expires, or if a member is for
any reason unable to complete such member's term, the
respective appointing authority shall appoint such member's
successor. Each appointing authority shall act to ensure
that each appointee is secured accurately and in a timely
manner, when a member's term expires or as soon as possible
100 when a member is unable to complete such member's term. A
101 member whose term has expired shall continue to serve until
102 a successor is appointed and qualified.
103 7. The commission, its employees and subcontractors
104 shall be subject to the regulation of conflicts of interest
105 as defined in sections 105.450 to 105.496 and to the
106 requirements for open meetings and records under chapter 610.
107 8. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the
108 contrary, any boundary adjustment approved by the
109 residential property owners and the governing bodies of the
110 affected municipalities or the county, if involved, and any
111 voluntary annexation approved by municipal ordinance
112 provided that the municipality owns the area to be annexed,

SB 1344 5
113 that the area is contiguous with the municipality, and that
114 the area is utilized only for parks and recreation purposes,
115 shall not be subject to commission review. Such a boundary
116 adjustment or annexation is not prohibited by the existence
117 of an established unincorporated area.
118 9. Any annexation of property or defined areas of
119 properties approved by a majority of property owners
120 residing thereon and by ordinance of any municipality that
121 is a service provider for both the water and sanitary sewer
122 within the municipality shall be effective as provided in
123 the annexation ordinance and shall not be subject to
124 commission review. Such annexation shall not be prohibited
125 by the existence of an established unincorporated area.
72.420. 1. The provisions of this section shall apply
to the consolidation of two or more cities, towns, villages,
unincorporated areas, or any combination thereof, in any
county with a charter form of government where fifty or more
cities, towns and villages have been incorporated or any
county with a charter form of government and with more than
two hundred thousand but fewer than three hundred fifty
thousand inhabitants. If a boundary commission has been
established pursuant to section 72.400, such proposal shall
be submitted to the commission, but if no such commission
has been established, consolidation of such areas shall be
accomplished pursuant to this section. All municipalities
and unincorporated areas which may be consolidated under the
procedures established in this section must be contiguous to
each other, so that if the consolidation is approved by the
voters pursuant to subsections 7 to 9 of this section, there
will be one municipality with all parts contiguous to at
least one other portion of the new municipality.

SB 1344 6
2. Whenever a petition for consolidation containing
the signatures of at least fifteen percent of the qualified
voters of each municipality or unincorporated area,
determined on the basis of the number of votes cast for
governor at the last gubernatorial election held prior to
the filing of the petition, is received by the governing
body of the county, the governing body of the county shall
submit the question of consolidation to the qualified voters
of each municipality and unincorporated area named in the
petition at the next state or county primary, general or
special election. The petition need not contain signatures
of qualified voters of a municipality if the governing body
of such municipality adopts an ordinance approving the
proposed consolidation which meets the requirements of
subsection 5 of this section, and sends a copy of the
ordinance to the governing body of the county in conjunction
with the petition prescribed by this subsection.
3. A petition for consolidation shall contain the
following:
(1) The names of the municipalities and a description
of any unincorporated area to be consolidated;
(2) The proposed effective date of consolidation;
(3) The number of votes cast in the last election in
each municipality and unincorporated area; and
(4) A statement that all signers are registered voters
in the affected municipalities or unincorporated areas.
The petition may contain the form of government, the name of
the municipality as consolidated and the details of
transition, such as which officers will serve, which
employees shall be retained, what taxes will be collected,
what ordinances will be in effect and similar matters for

SB 1344 7
the operation of the consolidated municipality until the new
governing body provides otherwise.
4. All persons signing the petition for consolidation
shall designate their address opposite their signatures, and
such signatures shall be affixed before a person who shall
certify, by affidavit acknowledged before a notary public,
that such signatures were affixed in his presence.
5. Any ordinance approving a proposed consolidation
shall contain the following:
(1) The names of the municipalities and a description
of any unincorporated area to be consolidated;
(2) The proposed effective date of the consolidation;
(3) The number of votes cast in the last election in
that municipality.
The ordinance may contain the form of government, the name
of the municipality as consolidated, and the details of
transition prescribed in subsection 3 of this section.
6. The costs of an election held under this section
shall be assessed proportionately to each municipality;
however, when a voting jurisdiction is composed of
unincorporated territory or territories, all costs of the
election in such voting jurisdictions shall be paid
proportionally by each municipality in the proposed
consolidation. Proportional election costs paid under this
section shall be assessed by charging each municipality the
same percentage of the total cost of the election as the
number of registered voters of the municipality on the day
of the election is to the total number of registered voters
on the day of the election, derived by adding together the
number of registered voters in each municipality.

SB 1344 8
7. The question shall be submitted separately, but on
the same date, to each municipality and unincorporated area
described in the petition or ordinances filed pursuant to
subsections 2 to 5 of this section. The question shall be
submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the municipalities of ______ (list all
municipalities) be consolidated into one
municipality?
□ YES □ NO
The consolidation shall only become effective if a separate
majority of the votes cast on the proposal in each
municipality and unincorporated area affected by such
proposal are in favor of the consolidation. If the voters
of any municipality or unincorporated area vote against such
proposal, the consolidation shall not take effect, even if
the voters of all other municipalities and unincorporated
areas vote in favor of the proposal.
8. If a consolidation is approved by the voters, such
proposal shall be effective six months following the date of
the election or the date specified in such proposal,
100 whichever date is later. Immediately following the
101 certification of the election, the governing body of each
102 affected municipality shall select two members and the
103 governing body of the county in which each unincorporated
104 territory is situated shall select two members from each
105 affected unincorporated territory to meet with similar
106 members appointed from other affected municipalities and
107 unincorporated territories in order to determine the details
108 of the transition.

SB 1344 9
109 9. If the consolidation is approved, it shall create a
110 new municipality, and the governing body of the county shall
111 declare such municipality, designating in such order the
112 metes and bounds thereof, and henceforth the inhabitants
113 within such bounds shall be a body politic and incorporate,
114 by the name and style of "the city of ______".
✓